Washington statutes.
RCW 35.48.050

Purchase of warrants on previous funds—Transfer of assets to revolving fund—Disposition.

Whenever a city or town has heretofore by ordinance created a fund for use in purchasing delinquent local improvement or condemnation award bonds or warrants not protected by the local improvement guaranty fund law, and has purchased any such bonds or warrants and issued warrants payable from said fund, which warrants are unpaid because of lack of funds and have remained unpaid for a period of less than thirty-two years from date of issue thereof, the city or town may use any funds available in the revolving fund to purchase said warrants at such price as it may determine, but in no event at more than fifty percent of the face value, without interest.

Whenever all such warrants have been purchased or paid, the city or town may transfer to the revolving fund any bonds, warrants or other assets belonging to said fund first above mentioned, and thereafter such bonds, warrants or other assets shall be held and disposed of for the benefit of said revolving fund in the same manner as other funds and assets therein: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in this chapter shall legalize any warrants heretofore issued or render any city or town liable thereunder.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.48.050. Prior: 1961 c 46 s 3; 1943 c 244 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9351-15.]